Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 9-15-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Wildlife and Natural Resource Funding Act.”

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 148, § 2, directs: “This act shall not expand or diminish the rights and obligations imposed on any party who received funds under W.S.

9-15-101

through

9-15-107

prior to December 31, 2013.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-15-102(a)(viii).

Library references. —

17 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 73.

§ 9-15-102.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account board created by W.S.

9-15-104

;

“Income account” means the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust income account created by W.S. 9-15-103(b);

“Large project” means a project for which the total of all grants sought or previously awarded under this act equals or exceeds two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00);

“Natural resource heritage” means renewable natural resources managed under a balanced stewardship that provides for the optimization of social, economic and cultural benefits for the citizens of Wyoming;

“Select committee” means the select natural resource funding committee created by W.S.

28-11-401

;

“Small project” means a project for which the total of all grants sought or previously awarded under this act is less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00);

“Trust account” means the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account created by W.S. 9-15-103(a);

“This act” means W.S.

9-15-101

through

9-15-107

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 1; 2008, ch. 53, § 2; ch. 74, §
1.

The 2008 amendments.

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 53, §
2, substituted “chapter” for “act” in (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 53 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 74, § 1, substituted “total of all grants sought or previously awarded” for “grant sought” in (a)(iii) and (a)(vi).

Laws 2008, ch. 74, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-15-103.
Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account created; income account created; expenditures; purposes.

A trust account is created to be known as the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account. The trust account shall consist of those funds designated to the account by law and all monies received from federal grants and other contributions, grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and donations to the trust account. The trust account is specifically empowered to accept grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and donations including those which are limited in their purposes by the grantor. Title to any interest in any real property conveyed to the trust account shall be held in the name of the state of Wyoming and shall be administered by the board of land commissioners. Funds deposited within the trust account are intended to be inviolate and constitute a perpetual trust account which shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with preservation of the account corpus.

The state treasurer shall credit to a Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust income account the earnings from investment of the trust account corpus. The legislature may, from time to time, appropriate funds directly to the income account for distribution in accordance with the terms of this act. Such specially appropriated funds shall be credited directly by the state treasurer to the income account and are available to the board for award of grants as otherwise permitted by this act.

Individuals and other entities may also grant, give, transfer, bequest or donate funds to the trust account or the income account. Such funds shall be credited by the board, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer, to either the trust account or the income account, as appropriate, in a manner consistent with the conditions attached to their receipt.

The board may expend funds from the income account for staffing and other administrative expenses authorized under this act. Additional disbursements from the income account shall be for the following purposes:

Improvement and maintenance of existing terrestrial habitat necessary to maintain optimum wildlife populations;

Preservation of open spaces by purchase or acquisition of development rights;

Improvement and maintenance of existing aquatic habitat necessary to maintain optimum fish populations;

Acquisition of terrestrial or aquatic habitat when existing habitat is determined critical, or is present in minimal amounts, and acquisition presents the necessary factor in attaining or preserving desired wildlife or fish population levels;

Conservation, maintenance, protection and development of wildlife resources, the environment and Wyoming’s natural resource heritage;

Participation in water enhancement projects to benefit aquatic habitat for fish populations and allow for other watershed enhancements that benefit wildlife;

To address and mitigate impacts detrimental to wildlife habitat, the environment and the multiple use of renewable natural resources attributable to residential, mineral and industrial development;

To mitigate conflicts and reduce potential for disease transmission between wildlife and domestic livestock.

No funds shall be made available under this act for the reintroduction of any native or nonnative game or nongame species pursuant to the Endangered Species Act of 1973, 16 U.S.C. 1531 et seq., as amended.

The board shall not have the power of eminent domain.

No funds shall be disbursed under this act for fee simple title acquisition of real property, nor shall funds be disbursed under this act to purchase water rights to be held by the state of Wyoming.

The board shall not accept any fee simple interest in real property but shall make recommendations to the board of land commissioners regarding acceptance of any such interest. The board of land commissioners shall only accept a fee simple interest in real property under this act, and the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account board shall only accept any other interest in property if the property is willingly conveyed by the holder of the interest. The board of land commissioners may in its sole discretion reject any offer to convey a fee simple interest in real property to any account under this act. The Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account board may in its sole discretion reject any offer to convey any other interest in property to any account under this act. Any appraisal of real property conducted at the direction of the board or the board of land commissioners under this act shall reflect the fair market value of the property.

The Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account board may recommend that the board of land commissioners dispose of any interest in real property within the trust account when the board determines that disposal of the interest would be in the best interests of the trust account. The net proceeds from any disposition of real property pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited to the trust account.

No water right shall be accepted under this act as a gift, transfer, bequest or donation unless the right is attached to real property accepted under the terms of this act. Any change of use of a water right acquired in this manner shall be done in full compliance with all provisions of Wyoming law.

The board shall not require public access to private land as a condition to receive any grant funds under this act.

Every conservation easement funded in whole or in part with monies made available by this act shall bind the parties thereto to an agreement which provides that the state of Wyoming is a third party beneficiary to the easement solely with the contingent right to enforce the terms of the easement if the grantee fails to enforce any of the terms of the easement. The agreement shall provide that if the easement is transferred for value, sold or extinguished without the consent of the board, the state of Wyoming shall have the right to either take legal action to enforce the terms of the easement or to recover from the proceeds of the transfer for value, sale or extinguishment, the state’s pro rata share of the proceeds based on the funds the state provided for the creation of the easement.

No funds shall be disbursed under this act for the purchase of easements which mandate specific livestock or crop management practices.

No funds shall be disbursed under this act for the purchase of easements which prohibit the use of land for ranching or farming if the ranching or farming could be conducted, using current or future technologies and techniques, without infringing on the underlying purpose of the easement.

No funds shall be disbursed under this act for the purchase of easements which prohibit hunting, fishing or trapping.

No funds shall be disbursed under this act unless the person receiving the funds certifies that no gratuities, kickbacks, gifts, commissions, contingency fees or other considerations have been or will be made in connection with the appropriation or the associated grant made by the board.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2013 ch. 148, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 126, § 1, effective March 3, 2017; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)” for “W.S.

9-4-711

” in (a).

The 2013 amendment,

added (n) through (q).

Laws 2013, ch. 148, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (c), inserted “board, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the” and made a related change in the second sentence.

The 2017 amendment

, added (r).

Laws 2017, ch. 126, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2017.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the last sentence of (a), substituted "by law" for "under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)," added "net" following "highest"; in the first sentence of (b), deleted "annually" following "shall credit" and substituted "earnings" for "interest earned."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2013, ch. 148, § 2,
directs: “This act shall not expand or diminish the
rights and obligations
imposed on any party who received funds under
W.S.

9-15-101

through

9-15-107

prior
to December 31, 2013.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-15-102(a)(viii).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 2, appropriates $15,000,000 from the budget reserve account to the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account and $300,000 from the budget reserve account to the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource income account to provide staffing and expenses of the wildlife and natural resource account board as authorized under this act for the fiscal period beginning July 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006.

§ 9-15-104.
Wildlife and natural resource trust account board established; terms; meetings; duties.

There is created the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account board. The board shall consist of nine (9) members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate, who are residents of Wyoming. The members shall be appointed from each of the appointment districts set forth in W.S.

5-3-101

. The board membership shall reflect a broad spectrum of experiences including wildlife, agriculture, energy, sportsmen and tourism.

Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, each appointed member of the board shall serve for a term of six (6) years. In 2011, three (3) members shall be appointed for six (6) years. In 2012, three (3) members shall be appointed for three (3) years. In 2013 and every second year thereafter, three (3) members shall be appointed for six (6) years. The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Any vacancy occurring between sessions of the legislature may be filled by the governor as provided under W.S. 28-12-101(b). The board shall select one (1) of its members to serve as chair.

Administration of any funds administered by the board shall be by the secretary to the board, who shall be employed by the board. The secretary shall not be housed in any agency which may be a grantee under this act. The secretary to the board shall further act as liaison for the board to other state, federal and local governmental agencies, as well as nonprofit organizations and members of the public who seek to provide input regarding grant proposals.

The board shall meet regularly. Members shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in the manner and amounts provided by law for state employees.

The board shall receive and evaluate applications for grants from the income account, shall forward applications for large projects to the select committee for review and recommendation. The board may approve grants for any small project. Funds in the income account are continuously appropriated for small project grants approved by the board and for approved large projects as specified by subsection (k) of this section.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act as necessary to carry out its duties under this act, including rules to:

Establish criteria for grants from the income account which accomplish the purposes of this act;

Establish criteria for matching funds or other in-kind contributions from grantees;

Evaluate, rank and prioritize grant proposals with an emphasis on those projects that are partnerships involving private and public entities;

Review and monitor grants to grantees;

Evaluate the effects of grant proposals on citizen access to public and state lands for hunting, fishing and recreation activities;

Establish criteria for the acceptance or rejection of gifts, transfers, bequests and donations including interests in real or personal property, which criteria shall not be inconsistent with this act. Based on those criteria, the board shall make recommendations regarding the acceptance of any fee simple interest in real property to the board of land commissioners. Based on those recommendations, the board of land commissioners shall make a final determination on acceptance or rejection of any fee simple interest in real property under this act;

Consider the socioeconomic impacts of the grant proposal on the community affected;

Consider other necessary matters.

In fulfilling its duties under this act the board may:

Consult with other governmental agencies, persons and nonprofit organizations, as necessary;

Accept or decline federal grants and other contributions, grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and donations of any money, personal property or interests in real property other than a fee simple interest from any source. The board shall make recommendations regarding the acceptance of any fee simple interest in real property to the board of land commissioners;

Participate with for profit corporations to develop wildlife habitat, but may not divert financial resources to a for profit corporation.

Recommend to the joint appropriations committee and the select committee that funds be transferred from the income account to the trust account.

The board shall annually report to the governor, the joint appropriations interim committee, the select committee and the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee no later than September 1 with respect to all federal grants, state appropriations and other contributions, grants, gifts, bequests and donations received and credited to the trust account and income account during the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include all grants awarded by the board to nonprofit and governmental organizations and progress made toward the condition of any grant made.

Until the corpus of the trust account exceeds two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000.00) the governor may also include in his proposed state budget recommendations for additional funding of the corpus of the trust account. The governor may also include in his proposed state budget recommendations for additional funding of the income account.

No funds shall initially be expended from the income account for large projects except upon specific legislative authorization. Following the initial legislative authorization to expend funds for a large project, the board may approve additional grants for that large project not to exceed a total of an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) and shall forward a notice of any such additional grant to the select committee within thirty (30) days of each approval. Subsequent legislative authorization shall be required for any grant in excess of the limits of this subsection.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 1; 2007, ch. 33, § 1; 2008, ch. 74, § 1; 2011, ch. 64, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “and state” in (f)(v).

The 2008 amendment,

in (e), added “and for approved large projects as specified by subsection (k) of this section” at the end, and deleted the former last sentence which read: “No funds shall be expended from the income account for large projects except upon specific legislative appropriation”; and added (k).

Laws 2008, ch. 74, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

in (b), rewrote the first and second sentences which formerly read: “Except for the initial board, each appointed member of the board shall serve for a term of three (3) years. Of the initial appointees, three (3) members shall be appointed for one (1) year, three (3) members shall be appointed for two (2) years and three (3) members shall be appointed for three (3) years,” and added the present fourth sentence.

Laws 2011, ch. 64, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2011.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, deleted the former last sentence of (a), which read, “Not more than five (5) members shall be of the same political party.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (g)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The governor vetoed provisions in subsection (e) specifying small project amounts.

Laws 2016, ch. 119 § 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-15-102(a)(viii).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 2, appropriates $15,000,000 from the budget reserve account to the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account and $300,000 from the budget reserve account to the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource income account to provide staffing and expenses of the wildlife and natural resource account board as authorized under this act for the fiscal period beginning July 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 5, provides that appointments to the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account board may be made under the act and the board may begin rulemaking proceedings under the act after the effective date of the section.

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 6(b), makes section 5 of the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8. Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 4, directs the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust account board to adopt final rules to implement the act not earlier than October 1, 2005, and not later than November 15, 2005.

§ 9-15-105.
Grant applications; eligible entities.

The board may only grant funds to nonprofit and governmental organizations. The board shall award grants to promote, preserve and enhance the wildlife, multiple use, natural resource and environmental heritage of Wyoming and its people. The board shall have the discretion to determine the amount of each grant and any conditions attached to the grant. For the purposes of this act, a grant shall not be used for the acquisition of a fee title interest in real property or any interest in water rights to be held by the state of Wyoming. Grant funds may be used for acquisition of personal property related to the project receiving the grant.

Grants by the board shall not provide a supplement to, or replacement of, the operating budget of any governmental agency or nonprofit organization except as those funds are directly related to the purposes of the grant.

No grants shall be awarded until rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant to W.S. 9-15-104(f) have become effective.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-15-102(a)(viii).

§ 9-15-106.
Audits.

The director of the department of audit or his designee shall audit the trust account annually. Copies of the audit shall be provided to the governor, the joint appropriations interim committee, the select committee and the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 1.

§ 9-15-107.
Application to mineral estates.

No provision of this act shall be construed to alter the law of Wyoming regarding the primacy of the mineral estate, to limit access to the mineral estate or to limit development of the mineral estate.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 225, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-15-102(a)(viii)